California statutes. Vehicle Code
(3) For transfer of the plates to another vehicle, fifteen dollars ($15).

(4) For each substitute replacement plate, thirty-five dollars ($35).

(5) In addition, for the issuance of an environmental license plate, as defined in Section 5103, the additional fees prescribed in Section 5106 and 5108. The additional fees prescribed in Sections 5106 and 5108 shall be deposited in the California Environmental License Plate Fund.

(c) After deducting its administrative costs under this section, the department, except as provided in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b), shall deposit the additional revenue derived from the issuance, renewal, transfer, and substitution of special environmental design license plates as follows:

(1) One-half in the California Beach and Coastal Enhancement Account, which is hereby established in the California Environmental License Plate Fund. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the money in the account shall be allocated by the Controller as follows:

(A) First to the California Coastal Commission for expenditure for the Adopt-A-Beach program, the Beach Cleanup Day program, coastal public education programs, and grants to local governments and nonprofit organizations for the costs of operating and maintaining public beaches related to these programs.

(B) Second, from funds remaining after the allocation required under subparagraph (A), to the State Coastal Conservancy for coastal natural resource restoration and enhancement projects and for other projects consistent with the provisions of Division 21 (commencing with Section 31000) of the Public Resources Code.

(2) One-half in the California Environmental License Plate Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 19.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5068.

(a) (1) (A) A veterans’ organization may apply either individually or with other veterans’ organizations to meet the application threshold set forth in Section 5060 for special interest plates. An organization that meets the minimum application requirement by applying with other organizations under this subdivision shall be issued a regular license plate bearing a distinctive design or decal approved under subdivision (a) of Section 5060.

(B) The Department of Veterans Affairs may modify the distinctive design or decal described in subparagraph (A), consistent with the design criteria imposed by Section 5060, to honor all veterans, or veterans who served in a particular war or
 armed conflict as described in subdivision (a) of Section 5068.1. Special interest plates issued under this section and bearing the modified design or decal shall be issued only after all existing plates have been issued.

(2) Any person who is the registered owner or lessee of a passenger vehicle, commercial motor vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, or semitrailer registered or certificated with the department, or any person who applies for an original registration or renewal of registration of that vehicle may apply under this section for a special interest license plate with a decal that honors all veterans or veterans who served in a particular war or armed conflict.

(3) Special interest license plates issued under this section may be issued in a combination of numbers or letters, or both, requested by the owner or lessee of the vehicle, to be displayed in addition to the design or
 decal authorized under paragraph (1), subject to Section 5105.

(b) In addition to the regular fees for an original registration, a renewal of registration, or a transfer of registration, the following fees shall be paid by individuals applying for a special interest license plate or a decal issued under this section:

(1) Fifty dollars ($50) for the initial issuance of the plates and decals. The plates shall be permanent and shall not be required to be replaced.

(2) Forty dollars ($40) for each renewal of registration that includes the continued display of the plates or decals.

(3) Fifteen dollars ($15) for transfer of the plates to another vehicle.

(4) Thirty-five dollars ($35) for
 replacement plates, if they become damaged or unserviceable.

(5) Ten dollars ($10) for replacement decals, if they become damaged or unserviceable.

(6) Notwithstanding Section 5106, seventy-eight dollars ($78) for the personalization of the plates, as authorized under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(c) The department shall maintain on its Internet Web site, a link to order online the special interest license plates issued pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 25.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5068.1.

By July 1, 2013, the department shall do all of the following:

(a) Issue a distinctive decal pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5068 to an applicant for an original or renewal of vehicle registration for veteran plates or plates honoring veterans to allow that applicant the option of recognizing his or her veteran status in, or honoring veterans of, a particular war or armed conflict, including, but not limited to, those who served in the active military, naval, or air
 service and performed any portion of their service during any of the periods described in Section 980 of the Military and Veterans Code, including active duty in a campaign or expedition for service in which a medal was authorized by the government of the United States.

(b) Make available to an applicant, upon request, a “yellow ribbon/support our troops” decal in lieu of the distinctive decal described in subdivision (a).

(c) Eliminate from inventory any decals for which the department determines that demand is insufficient to maintain that inventory in a cost-effective manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 398, Sec. 2.   (AB 1550)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5069.

Revenue derived from the additional special fees provided in Section 5068, less costs incurred by the department pursuant to this article, shall be deposited in the Veterans Service Office Fund, created by Section 972.2 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 166, Sec. 2.   (AB 1908)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5072.

(a) Any person described in Section 5101 may also apply for a set of “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plates, and the department shall issue those special license plates in lieu of the regular license plates. The “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” plates shall be distinct from other existing license plates by the inclusion of a well within the portion of the license plate that has the alpha-numeric sequence. The well may be placed in any position within that portion of the license plate. A heart shape, a five-pointed star, a hand shape, a plus-sign shape, shall be imprinted within the well itself. However, for purposes of processing the alpha-numeric sequence, the symbol within the well shall be read as a blank within the
 alpha-numeric sequence. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall cooperate with representatives of the California Highway Patrol and the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority to design the final shape and dimension of the symbols for these license plates.

(b) An applicant for a license plate described in subdivision (a) may choose to either accept a license plate character sequence assigned by the department that includes one of the four symbols or request a specialized license plate character sequence determined by the applicant that includes one of the four symbols, in accordance with instructions which shall be provided by the department.

(c) In addition to the regular fees for an original registration, a renewal of registration, or a transfer of
 registration, the following “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plate fees shall be paid:

(1) Notwithstanding Section 5106, for those specialized license plates whose character sequence is determined by the license owner or applicant:

(A) Fifty dollars ($50) for the initial issuance of the plates. These plates shall be permanent and shall not be required to be replaced.

(B) Forty dollars ($40) for each renewal of registration which includes the continued display of the plates.

(C) Fifteen dollars ($15) for transfer of the plates to another vehicle.

(D) Thirty-five dollars ($35) for
 replacement plates, if the plates become damaged or unserviceable.

(2) For those specialized license plates whose character sequence is assigned by the department:

(A) Twenty dollars ($20) for the initial issuance of the plates. These plates shall be permanent and shall not be required to be replaced.

(B) The legally allowed fee for renewal plus fifteen dollars ($15) for each renewal of registration, which includes the continued display of the plates.

(C) Fifteen dollars ($15) for transfer of the plates to another vehicle.

(D) Twenty dollars ($20) for replacement plates, if the plates become
 damaged or unserviceable.

(d) When payment of renewal fees is not required as specified in Section 4000, or when the person determines to retain the “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plates upon sale, trade, or other release of the vehicle upon which the plates have been displayed, the person shall notify the department and the person may retain the plates.

(e) The revenue derived from the additional special fees provided in this section, less costs incurred by the department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and local law enforcement for developing and administering this license plate program pursuant to this section, shall be deposited in the Child Health and Safety Fund, created pursuant to Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 18285) of Part 6
 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and, when appropriated by the Legislature shall be available for the purposes specified in that chapter.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the additional special fees specified in subdivision (e) are not used to replace existing appropriation levels in the 1991–92 Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 72.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5074.

(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the Polanco-Bates License Plates for the Arts Act of 1993. The California Arts Council shall participate in the special interest license plate program.

(b) In addition to the regular fees for an original registration or renewal of registration, the following additional fees shall be paid for the issuance, transfer, or renewal of license plates bearing, notwithstanding Section 5060, a full-plate graphic design that depicts a significant feature or quality of the State of
 California, approved by the department in consultation with the California Arts Council:

(1) For the original issuance of the plates, fifty dollars ($50).

(2) For a renewal of registration of the plates, forty dollars ($40).

(3) For the transfer of the special plates to another vehicle, fifteen dollars ($15).

(4) In addition, for the issuance of an environmental license plate, as defined in Section 5103, with a full-plate graphic design, the additional fees prescribed in Sections 5106 and 5108. The additional fees prescribed in Sections 5106 and 5108 shall be deposited in the
 California Environmental License Plate Fund.

(c) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), all fees collected under this section, after deduction of the department’s costs in administering this section, shall be deposited in the Graphic Design License Plate Account, which is hereby established in the General Fund. The funds in the account shall be used by the California Arts Council, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for arts education and local arts programming.

(d) The California Arts Council shall use the revenue derived from the fee increases authorized by amendment of this section during the 2003–04 Regular Session exclusively for arts education and local arts programming.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 221, Sec. 1.   (SB 789)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5075.

(a) The department, in consultation with the California Tahoe Conservancy, shall design and make available for issuance pursuant to this article special environmental design license plates as described in this section. Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 5060, the special environmental design license plates shall bear a full-plate graphic design depicting a significant feature of Lake Tahoe. Any person described in Section 5101 may, upon payment of the additional fees set forth in subdivision (b), apply for and be issued a set of special environmental design license plates. Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 5060, the special environmental design license plates may be issued as environmental license plates, as defined in Section 5103.

(b) In addition to the regular fees for an original registration or renewal of registration, the following additional fees shall be paid for the issuance, renewal, or transfer of the special environmental design license plates authorized pursuant to this section:

(1) For the original issuance of the plates, fifty dollars ($50).

(2) For a renewal of registration with the plates, forty dollars ($40).

(3) For transfer of the plates to another vehicle, fifteen dollars ($15).

(4) For each substitute replacement plate, thirty-five dollars ($35).

(5) In addition, for the issuance of environmental license plates, as defined in Section 5103, with a full-plate graphic design described in subdivision (a), the additional fees prescribed in Sections 5106 and 5108. The additional fees prescribed in Sections 5106 and 5108 shall be deposited in the Environmental License Plate Fund.

(c) Except as provided in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b), and after deducting its administrative costs under this section, the department shall deposit the additional revenue derived from the issuance, renewal, transfer, and substitution of special environmental design license plates in the Lake Tahoe Conservancy Account, which is hereby created in the California Environmental License Plate Fund. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the money in the account shall be allocated by the Controller to the California Tahoe Conservancy or its successor for expenditure for the exclusive trust purposes of preservation and restoration projects in the Lake Tahoe area and for the purpose of establishing and improving trails, pathways, and public access for nonmotorized traffic in that area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1303, Sec. 3.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. Environmental License Plates [5100. - 5112.]

5100.

The purpose of this article is to provide revenue for the California Environmental License Plate Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1105.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.

Any person who is the registered owner or lessee of a passenger vehicle, commercial motor vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, or semitrailer registered or certificated with the department, or who makes application for an original registration or renewal registration of that vehicle, may, upon payment of the fee prescribed in Section 5106 and those fees required by Sections 5022 to 5024, inclusive, apply to the department for environmental license plates, in the manner prescribed in Section 5105, which plates shall be affixed to the passenger vehicle, commercial motor vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, or semitrailer for which registration is sought in lieu of the regular license plates.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 861, Sec. 28.5) by Stats. 2001, Ch. 826, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.2.

(a) A person otherwise eligible under this article who is a firefighter, retired firefighter, or a surviving family member of a firefighter or retired firefighter may apply for special license plates for a vehicle under this article. License plates issued pursuant to this section shall be issued in accordance with Section 5060.

(b) The applicant, by proof satisfactory to the department, shall show that the applicant is a firefighter, retired firefighter, or a surviving family member of a firefighter or retired firefighter, who meets all of the following:

(1) Is presently, was at the time of their death, or has or had retired
 in good standing as, an officer, an employee, or a member of a fire department or a fire service of the state, a county, a city, a district, or any other political subdivision of the state, whether in a volunteer, partly paid, or fully paid status.

(2) Is or was until retirement or death, regularly employed as a firefighter or regularly enrolled as a volunteer firefighter.

(3) Has, or had before retirement or death, principal duties which fall within the scope of active firefighting and any of the following activities:

(A) Fire prevention service.

(B) Fire training.

(C) Hazardous materials
 abatement.

(D) Arson investigation.

(E) Emergency medical services.

(c) The special license plates issued under this section shall contain the words “California Firefighter” and shall run in a regular numerical series.

(d) In addition to the regular fees for an original registration, a renewal of registration, or a transfer of registration, the following special license plate fees shall be paid:

(1) A fee of fifty dollars ($50) for the initial issuance of the special license plates. These special license plates shall be permanent and shall not be required to be replaced.

(2) A fee of forty dollars ($40) for each renewal of registration that includes the continued display of the special license plates.

(3) If the special license plates become damaged or unserviceable, a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35) for the replacement of the special license plates, obtained from the department upon proper application therefor.

(4) A fee of fifteen dollars ($15) for the transfer of the special license plates to another vehicle qualifying as a vehicle owned by a firefighter who has met the requirements set forth in subdivision (b).

(5) In addition, for the issuance of environmental license plates, as defined in Section 5103, with the special
 firefighter personal vehicle license plates and distinctive design or decal, the additional fees prescribed in Sections 5106 and 5108. The additional fees collected pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited in the California Environmental License Plate Fund.

(e) (1) Upon the death of a person issued special license plates pursuant to this section, their surviving spouse may retain the special license plates. Except as provided in paragraph (2), upon the death of the surviving spouse, the plates shall be returned to the department or destroyed within 60 days after the death of the surviving spouse or upon the expiration of the vehicle registration,
 whichever occurs first.

(2) (A) In the absence of a surviving spouse or where the surviving spouse dies while in possession of the special license plates, a member of the deceased firefighter’s family may retain one of the special license plates as a family heirloom, subject to the conditions set forth in subdivision (f).

(B) As used in this paragraph, “family” means grandparents, stepgrandparents, parents, stepparents, siblings, stepsiblings, stepchildren, natural-born children, or adopted children of the person issued the special license plates under subdivision (a).

(f) The special license plates issued under this section are not valid for use for vehicle registration purposes by a person
 other than the person issued the special license plates under subdivision (a) and the surviving spouse of that person.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Surviving family member” means the spouse and any child, including an adopted child, stepchild, or recognized natural child of a deceased firefighter or deceased retired firefighter. “Surviving family member” does not include a former spouse.

(2) “Spouse” includes a domestic partner in a domestic partnership as described in Section 297 of the Family Code.

(h) Except as provided in paragraph (5) of subdivision (d), the revenues derived from the additional special
 fees provided in this section, less costs incurred by the department pursuant to this section, shall be deposited in the California Firefighters’ Memorial Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund established by Section 18802 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 602, Sec. 2.   (SB 374)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.3.

(a) Any person otherwise eligible under this article who qualifies under subdivision (b) may apply for special license plates that shall run in a separate numerical series and shall contain the words “Pearl Harbor Survivor.” The plates may be issued for any vehicle, except a vehicle used for transportation for hire, compensation, or profit, or a motorcycle, which is owned or coowned by the person.

(b) To qualify for issuance of the special plates, the applicant by satisfactory proof shall show all of the following:

(1) The applicant was a member of the United States Armed Forces on December 7, 1941, and received an honorable discharge from military service.

(2) The applicant was on station at Pearl Harbor, the Island of Oahu, or offshore within a distance of three miles, on December 7, 1941, during the hours of 7:55 a.m. to 9:45 a.m., Hawaii time, as certified by a California chapter of the Pearl Harbor Survivors Association.

(c) Upon the death of a person issued special license plates pursuant to this section, his or her surviving spouse may retain the special license plates subject to the conditions set forth in this section. Upon the death of the spouse, the retained special license plates shall be returned to the department either (1) within 60 days following that death or (2) upon the expiration of the vehicle registration, whichever occurs first.

(d) Sections 5106 and 5108 do not apply to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 612, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.4.

(a) Any person otherwise eligible under this article who is a recipient of the Army Medal of Honor, Navy Medal of Honor, Air Force Medal of Honor, Army Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, or Air Force Cross may apply for special license plates for the vehicle under this article.

(b) The applicant, by conclusive evidence, shall show that the applicant is a recipient of one of the nation’s highest decorations for valor, as specified in subdivision (a).

(c) The special license plates issued under this section shall contain the words “Legion of Valor” and shall run in a regular numerical series. An adhesive sticker
 denoting which of the nation’s highest decorations for valor, as specified in subdivision (a), is held by the applicant shall be affixed in a recess provided for it on the license plates.

(d) Upon the death of a person issued special license plates pursuant to this section, his or her surviving spouse may retain the special license plates subject to the conditions set forth in this section. If there is no surviving spouse, the special license plates shall be returned to the department either (1) within 60 days following that death or (2) upon the expiration of the vehicle registration, whichever occurs first. However, in the absence of a surviving spouse, another surviving member of the deceased medal recipient’s family may retain one of the special license plates as a family heirloom, subject to the
 conditions set forth in subdivision (g).

 (e) If a surviving spouse who has elected to retain the special license plates as authorized under subdivision (d) dies while in possession of the special license plates, the special license plates shall be returned to the department either within 60 days following that death, or upon the expiration date of the vehicle registration, whichever date occurs first. However, another surviving member of the deceased medal recipient’s family may retain one of the special license plates as a family heirloom, subject to the
 conditions set forth in subdivision (g).

(f) Sections 5106 and 5108 do not apply to this section.(g) The special license plates issued under this section are not valid for use for vehicle registration purposes or for the purposes of Section 9105, or Section 10783 or 10783.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, by a person other than the person issued the special license plates under subdivision (a) and the surviving spouse of that person.

(h) For purposes of this section, “family” means grandparents, stepgrandparents, parents, stepparents, siblings, stepsiblings, children, and stepchildren of the person issued the special license plates under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 181, Sec. 1.   (SB 1295)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.5.

(a) A person otherwise eligible under this article who is a former American prisoner of war may apply for special license plates for the vehicle under this article. The special license plates assigned to the vehicle shall run in a separate numerical series and contain a replica design of the American Prisoner of War Medal followed by the letters “POW” and four numbers. The special license plates issued under this subdivision also shall contain the following words: “Ex-Prisoner of War.” The department shall, pursuant to this article, reserve and issue the special license plates provided for by this section only to persons who show by satisfactory proof former prisoner-of-war status. A person otherwise issued license plates within this series
 pursuant to this article prior to January 1, 1982, may retain them.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department, in consultation with the Department of Veterans Affairs and veterans’ service organizations, shall design and make available for issuance pursuant to this article a special environmental design license plate for former American prisoners of war who prefer not to have their former status as a “POW” or “Ex-Prisoner of War” identified by words or other markings or symbols. This section is not intended to prohibit individuals eligible for the special license plate from selecting the existing license plate design specified in subdivision (a). The design criteria for a special interest license plate pursuant to this subdivision are as follows:

(1) The license plate for a passenger vehicle, commercial vehicle, or trailer shall provide a space not larger than two inches
 by three inches to the left of the numerical series and a space not larger than five-eighths of an inch in height below the numerical series for a distinctive design, decal, or descriptive message as authorized by this subdivision. The license plates shall be issued in sequential numerical order or, pursuant to Section 5103, in a combination of numbers or letters.

(2) The license plate shall not identify “POW” or “Ex-Prisoner of War” by words or other markings or symbols.

(c) Special license plates may be issued pursuant to subdivision (a) only for a vehicle owned or coowned by a former American prisoner of war.

(d) Upon the death of a person issued the special license plates pursuant to this section, his or her surviving spouse may retain the special license plates subject to the conditions set forth in this
 section. If there is no surviving spouse, the special license plates shall be returned to the department either within 60 days following that death, or upon the expiration date of the vehicle registration, whichever date occurs first. However, in the absence of a surviving spouse, a member of the former prisoner of war’s family may retain one of the special license plates as a family heirloom, subject to the conditions set forth in subdivision (i), upon submitting an affidavit to the department agreeing not to attempt to use the special license plates for vehicle registration purposes.

(e) If a surviving spouse who has elected to retain the special license plates as authorized under subdivision (d) dies while in possession of the special license plates, the special license plates shall be returned to the department either within 60 days following that death, or upon the expiration date of the vehicle registration, whichever date occurs first.
 However, a member of the former prisoner of war’s family may retain one of the special license plates as a family heirloom, subject to the conditions set forth in subdivision (i), upon submitting an affidavit to the department agreeing not to attempt to use the special license plates for vehicle registration purposes.

(f) A vehicle exempted from fees by Section 9105 and by Section 10783 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall lose the exemption upon the death of the former American prisoner of war, except that if a surviving spouse elects to retain the special license plates as authorized under subdivision (d), the exemption pursuant to Section 9105, and Section 10783.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall extend until the death of that spouse.

(g) Sections 5106 and 5108 do not apply to this section.

(h) The
 department shall recall all former prisoner-of-war special license plates issued pursuant to this section prior to January 1, 1999, and shall issue to the holder of those special license plates, without charge, the revised special license plates authorized by this section.

(i) The special license plates issued under this section are not valid for use for vehicle registration purposes or for the purposes of Section 9105 or Section 10783 or 10783.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code by a person other than the person issued the special license plates under subdivision (a) and the surviving spouse of that person.

(j) For purposes of this section, “family” means grandparents, stepgrandparents, parents, stepparents, siblings, stepsiblings, children, and stepchildren of the person issued the special license plates under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 345, Sec. 2.   (AB 498)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.6.

(a) A person otherwise eligible under this article who is a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient may apply for special license plates for the vehicle under this article. The special license plates assigned to the vehicle shall run in a separate numerical series and shall have inscribed on the license plate the words “Congressional Medal of Honor” or “Medal of Honor.” The department shall reserve and issue the special license plates to all applicants providing the proof required by subdivision (b).

(b) The applicant shall, by satisfactory proof, show that the applicant is a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient.

(c) Special license plates may be issued pursuant to subdivision (a) only for a vehicle owned or coowned by a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient.

(d) Upon the death of a person issued special license plates pursuant to this section, his or her surviving spouse may retain the special license plates subject to the conditions set forth in this section. If there is no surviving spouse, the special license plates shall be returned to the department either within 60 days following that death, or upon the expiration date of the vehicle registration, whichever date occurs first. However, in the absence of a surviving spouse, a member of the Congressional Medal of Honor recipient’s family may retain one of the special license plates as a family heirloom, subject to the conditions set forth in subdivision (h), upon submitting an affidavit to the department agreeing not to attempt to use the special license plates for vehicle registration purposes.

(e) If a surviving spouse who has elected to retain the special license plates as authorized under subdivision (d) dies while in possession of the special license plates, the special license plates shall be returned to the department either within 60 days following that death, or upon the expiration date of the vehicle registration, whichever date occurs first. However, a member of the Congressional Medal of Honor recipient’s family may retain one of the special license plates as a family heirloom, subject to the conditions set forth in subdivision (h), upon submitting an affidavit to the department agreeing not to attempt to use the special license plates for vehicle registration purposes.

(f) A vehicle exempted from fees by Section 9105 and by Section 10783 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall lose the exemption upon the death of the Congressional Medal of Honor recipient, except that if a surviving spouse elects to retain the special license plates as authorized under subdivision (d), the exemption pursuant to Section 9105, and Section 10783.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall extend until the death of that spouse.

(g) Sections 5106 and 5108 do not apply to this section.

(h) The special license plates issued under this section are not valid for use for vehicle registration purposes or for the purposes of Section 9105 or Section 10783 or 10783.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code by a person other than the person issued the special license plates under subdivision (a) and the surviving spouse of that person.

(i) For the purposes of this section, “family” means grandparents, stepgrandparents, parents, stepparents, siblings, stepsiblings, children, and stepchildren of the person issued the special license plates under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 357, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.8.

(a) Any person otherwise eligible under this article who is a Purple Heart recipient may apply for special license plates for vehicles that are not used for transportation for hire, compensation, or profit, under this article. The special plates assigned to the vehicle shall run in a separate numerical series, shall have inscribed on the plate the Purple Heart insignia, and shall contain the words “Combat Wounded” and “Purple Heart” or at least the letters “PH” as part of the numerical series. The department shall reserve and issue the special plates to all applicants providing the proof required by subdivision (b).

(b) The applicant, by satisfactory proof, shall show that the
 applicant is a Purple Heart recipient.

(c) Special plates may be issued pursuant to subdivision (a) only for a vehicle owned or coowned by a Purple Heart recipient.

(d) Upon the death of a person issued special license plates pursuant to this section, his or her surviving spouse may retain the special license plates subject to the conditions set forth in this section. If there is no surviving spouse, the special license plates shall be returned to the department either (1) within 60 days following that death or (2) upon the expiration of the vehicle registration, whichever occurs first. However, in the absence of a surviving spouse, another surviving member of the deceased Purple Heart recipient’s family may retain one of the special license plates as a family heirloom, subject to
 the conditions set forth in subdivision (h).

(e) If a surviving spouse who has elected to retain the special license plates as authorized under subdivision (d) dies while in possession of the special license plates, the special license plates shall be returned to the department either within 60 days following that death, or upon the expiration date of the vehicle registration, whichever date occurs first. However, another surviving member of the deceased Purple Heart recipient’s family may retain one of the special license plates as a family heirloom,
 subject to the conditions set forth in subdivision (h).

(f) When an applicant for the Purple Heart license plate qualifies as a disabled veteran, as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 22511.55, the applicant may also apply for a distinguishing placard described in subdivision (a) of Section 22511.55 to be used in conjunction with the Purple Heart license plate for the purpose of allowing special parking privileges pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22511.5.

(g) Sections 5106 and 5108 do not apply to this section.(h) The special license plates issued under this section are not valid for use for vehicle registration purposes or for the purposes of Section 9105, or Section 10783 or 10783.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, by a person other than the person issued the special license plates under subdivision (a) and the
 surviving spouse of that person.

(i) For purposes of this section, “family” means grandparents, stepgrandparents, parents, stepparents, siblings, stepsiblings, children, and stepchildren of the person issued the special license plates under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 181, Sec. 2.   (SB 1295)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.9.

(a) Until December 31, 1991, any person described in Section 5101 may apply for a set of commemorative Bicentennial of the Bill of Rights reflectorized license plates and the department shall issue those special license plates in lieu of regular license plates. No commemorative Bicentennial of the Bill of Rights reflectorized license plates shall be issued pursuant to an application submitted on or after January 1, 1992, but the holder of those plates may thereafter renew or retain them, obtain substitute replacements for them, or transfer them to another vehicle, subject to this section. However, substitute replacement plates shall not be available on or after January 1, 1997. Thereafter, unless otherwise provided by law, regular series plates shall be issued for the fee provided in Section 9265 whenever substitute plates are required.

(b) The commemorative Bicentennial of the Bill of Rights reflectorized license plates shall be of a distinctive design and shall be available in a special series of letters or numbers, or both, as determined by the department.

(c) In addition to the regular fees for an original or renewal registration, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35).

(d) Notwithstanding Section 9265, the applicant for substitute commemorative Bicentennial of the Bill of Rights reflectorized license plates shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35).

(e) Whenever any person who has been issued commemorative Bicentennial of the Bill of Rights reflectorized license plates applies to the department for transfer of the plates to another vehicle, a transfer fee of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be charged in addition to all other appropriate fees.

(f) Sections 5106 and 5108 do not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 312, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1990, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 312.)
-------------------------------------------

5102.

The environmental license plates shall be the same color and design as regular passenger vehicle, commercial vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer license plates, and shall consist of any combination of numbers or letters, not exceeding seven positions and not less than two positions, if there are no conflicts with existing passenger, commercial, trailer, motorcycle, or special license plates series or with Section 4851.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5103.
